src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON KANON !!≈ * **@CODE@** kanovdna with short cmp form kánon/kánun as well
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ánon%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ánun%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:anovdna%> R ;
 +Sg+Nom:anovdna K ;
! +Sg+Nom:anovdna%> NPx3V ;
 :anovdna%> EssV ;
 :anovdna%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! :anovdna%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 :anovdna DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :anovdna DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 :anovdna DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON SOSIAL !!≈ * **@CODE@** Recent loanwords on -ála with both short and long cmp-form
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a%> R ;
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj K ;
! +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx3V ;
 :a%> EssV ;
 :a%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
! :a%> GOAHTAI ; !ai-illativ only for iija-words
 :a DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
 :a DenominalAdjsV2 ;
 :a DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GARGIA !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Vowel-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>i K ;
 +Err/Orth:X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Loc:%>s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>in K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>id9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>id9 R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>id9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ide K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>igujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>i∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
< "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3A ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx12A ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:%>n%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":0 "+Nom":%> 0:i 0:d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>idas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>id%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>in%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%> DenominalNounsV ; !This is not very plausible
 :%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible

LEXICON MEDIA !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Vowel-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change, with -i(i)ja Err/Orth
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ja K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ija K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:ja%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:ija%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:ja K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:ija K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:ja%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:ija%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:ja K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:ija K ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>i K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:jai K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ijai K ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:a%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:jas K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:ijas K ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>in K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:jain K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijain K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:jat K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ijat K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>id9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:jaid9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ijaid9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>id9 R ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>id9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jaid9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ijaid9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>ide K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:jaide K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ijaide K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>in K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:jaide K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ijaide K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>igujn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:jaigujn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ijaigujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:a%>i∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
< "+Sg":a "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3A ;
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx12A ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":a "+Nom":%> 0:i 0:d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>idas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>id%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>in%> NPxPlComC ;
! :a%> DenominalNounsV ; !This is not very plausible
 :a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible



LEXICON OBOE !!≈ * **@CODE@**  oe-final loan words without Gradation and Ill ^change
! gen = nom ill = -i
 +Sg+Nom:e K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen:e K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:e K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i%>i K ;
 +Sg+Loc:e%>s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:e%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:i%>in K ;
 +Ess:e%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:e%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>id9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:i%>id9 R ;
 +Pl+Acc:i%>id9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>ide K ;
 +Pl+Loc:i%>in K ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>igujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:i%>i∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
< "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3A ;
 +Sg+Nom:e%> NPx12A ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Acc:e%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Ill:e%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:e%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:e%>n%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":0 "+Nom":i 0:%> 0:i 0:d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:i%>id%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>idas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:i%>in%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>id%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:i%>in%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%> DenominalNounsV ; !This is not very plausible
! :%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :%> DenominalAdjsV2 ;				!This is not very plausible


LEXICON BUFFALO !!≈ * **@CODE@** consonant fin loanwords, some vow fin like revya
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:a K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:a%> R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG: K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%:as K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%:ajn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%:in K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%:in K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>%:an K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx12Vvowch ;
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx3Vvowchflag ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:a%>jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 :a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 :a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible

LEXICON ESSAYA !!≈ * **@CODE@** recent loanwords on vow+a
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
< "+Sg":a "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3A ;
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx12A ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Acc:a%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
< "+Pl":a "+Nom":%> 0:j 0:d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 :a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 :a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible


LEXICON MASAI !!≈ * **@CODE@** only masai
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i K ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>jd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:a%>sa%> NPxA ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Ess:a%>n%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:a%>jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 :a%> DenominalNounsV ;
 :a%> DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
! :a%> DenominalAdjsV2 ; !not very plausible



!!!!! 2b. special lexicas for stray words/isolated occurrences
! - - - - - - - ----------------------------------
