src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns  !!= * **@CODE@** is pointed to from NounRoot above
Samvirke-kafea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Sem/Plc:Samvirke-kafe ESSAYA ;
Siida-musea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpNP/First+Sem/Build_Org:Siida-muse ESSAYA ;
TV-festivála+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Event:TV-festivál SOSIAL ;
mánáid-TV-kanála+N+CmpNP/First+Sem/Plc-abstr:mánáid9-TV-kanál SOSIAL ;
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
dáččamedia+N+Sem/Org:dáčča#medi MEDIA ;
dážamedia+N+Sem/Org:dáža#medi MEDIA ;
media+N+Sem/Org:medi MEDIA ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
ageantaadverbiála+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ageanta#adverbi^ál SOSIAL "agent adverbial N" ;
alléa+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Route:allé ESSAYA ;
aloe+N+CmpN/SgN+OLang/NOB+Sem/Plant:alo OBOE ;
bargomorála+N+Sem/Dummytag:bargo#morál SOSIAL ;
beanavuodjenkaféa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:beana#vuodjen#kafé ESSAYA ;
boaresbártniidfestivála+N+Sem/Event:boares#bártniid9#festivál SOSIAL ;
boradankafea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:boradan#kafe ESSAYA ;
bronsafinála+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Event:bronse#finál SOSIAL ;
cupfinála+N+Sem/Event:cup9#finál SOSIAL ;
demeansakafea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:demeansa#kafe ESSAYA ;
diehtomateriála+N+Sem/Dummytag:diehto#materi^ál SOSIAL ;
duogášmateriála+N+Sem/Dummytag:duogáš#materi^ál SOSIAL ;
dálvefestivála+N+Sem/Event:dálve#festivál SOSIAL ;
ealáhuskomitea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:ealáhus#komite ESSAYA ;
eanandoalloareála+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:eanan#doallo#are^ál SOSIAL ;
eskimoa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eskimo ESSAYA ;
festivála+N+Sem/Event:festivál SOSIAL ;
fitnodatidéa+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:fitnodat#idé ESSAYA ;
gaskaijafestivála+N+Sem/Event:gaska#ija#festivál SOSIAL ;
geaidnomusea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:geaidno#muse ESSAYA ;
gielladikšunkafea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:giella#dikšun#kafe ESSAYA ;
gilioriginála+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gili#originál SOSIAL ;
girkolaškomitea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:girkolaš#komite ESSAYA ;
guohtonareála+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:guohton#are^ál SOSIAL ;
guollefilea+N+Sem/Food:guolle#file ESSAYA ;
gártenmateriála+N+Sem/Dummytag:gárten#materi^ál SOSIAL ;
hebrea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hebre ESSAYA ;
hálddašanmusea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:hálddašan#muse ESSAYA ;
joikikála+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Prod-vis:joij9kikal SOSIAL ; !Plupp
justiisakomitea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:justiisa#komite ESSAYA ;
kanovdna+N+Sem/Wpn:k KANON ;
karnevála+N+Sem/Event:karnevál SOSIAL ; !^LOAN
kirkolaškomitéa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:kirkolaš#komité ESSAYA ;
kommunikéa+N+Sem/Txt:kommuniké ESSAYA ;
kulttorskuvlafestivála+N+Sem/Event:kulttor#skuvla#festivál SOSIAL ;
kursakomitéa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:kursa#komité ESSAYA ;
kvenamuséa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:kvena#musé ESSAYA ;
lásepokála+N+Sem/Obj:láse#pokál SOSIAL ;
masai+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:masai MASAI ;
mediabajásgeassinmateriála+N+Sem/Dummytag:media#bajás#geassin#materi^ál SOSIAL ;
militearaattašéa+N+Sem/Dummytag:militeara#attašé ESSAYA ; !^LOAN
moskea+N+Sem/Build:moske ESSAYA ;
máttafestivála+N+Sem/Event:mátta#festivál SOSIAL ;
nationálamusea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:nationála#muse ESSAYA ;
njuovvanskandála+N+Sem/Dummytag:njuovvan#skandál SOSIAL ;
nuoraidkomitéa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:nuoraid9#komité ESSAYA ;
oboe+N+CmpN/SgN+OLang/NOB+Sem/Tool-music:obo OBOE ;
olgofestivála+N+Sem/Event:olgo#festivál SOSIAL ;
olgomuséa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:olgo#musé ESSAYA ;
orkidea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plant:orkide ESSAYA ;
pomorafestivála+N+Sem/Event:pomora#festivál SOSIAL ;
rohkkamusikála+N+Sem/Prod-vis:rohkka#musikál SOSIAL ;
sketša-idea+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:sketša-ide ESSAYA ;
skuvlajournála+N+Sem/Txt:skuvla#journál SOSIAL ;
sámemusihkkafestivála+N+Sem/Event:sáme#musihkka#festivál SOSIAL ;
thai+N+Sem/Lang:thai MASAI ;
trasea+N+Sem/Route:trase ESSAYA ;
universitehtamusea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Build_Org:universitehta#muse ESSAYA ;
vokála+N+Sem/Cat:vokál SOSIAL ;
válgakafea+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Event:válga#kafe ESSAYA ;
álbmotmusihkkafestivála+N+Sem/Event:álbmot#musihkka#festivál SOSIAL ;
árenkanovdna+N+Sem/Dummytag:áren#k KANON ;
švávokála+N+Sem/Cat:švá#vokál SOSIAL ;
